Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1465
Campaign statement; verification statement; signature; requirements.

(1) A campaign statement filed by a committee shall:

(a) Be signed by the committee treasurer; and

(b) Contain a verification statement which states that the treasurer used all reasonable diligence in its preparation, that to the treasurer's knowledge it is true and complete, and if the committee is a candidate committee, that to the best of the candidate's knowledge the statement is true and complete.

(2) The verification statement shall be signed by the treasurer and, in the case of a candidate committee, by the candidate.

(3) The verification statement shall be required to perfect the filing of the campaign statement. A campaign statement shall cover the period beginning the day after the closing date of the last campaign statement and end on the closing date as specified in the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 65;

Laws 1999, LB 581, § 2.